Hawaii statutes.
[§556A-7] Disclosure of content of
electronic communications of deceased user. If a deceased user consented
or a court directs disclosure of the contents of electronic communications of
the user, the custodian shall disclose to the personal representative of the
estate of the user the content of an electronic communication sent or received
by the user if the personal representative gives the custodian:

(1) A written request for disclosure in physical or
electronic form;

(2) A certified copy of the death certificate of the
user;

(3) A certified copy of the letter of appointment of
the personal representative or a small estate affidavit or court order;

(4) Unless the user provided direction using an
online tool, a copy of the user's will, trust, power of attorney, or other
record evidencing the user's consent to disclosure of the content of electronic
communications; and

(5) If requested by the custodian:

(A) A number, username, address, or other
unique subscriber or account identifier assigned by the custodian to identify
the user's account;

(B) Evidence linking the account to the user;
or

(C) A finding by the court that:

(i) The user had a specific account with the
custodian, identifiable by the information specified in subparagraph (A);

(ii) Disclosure of the content of electronic
communications of the user would not violate title 18 U.S.C. section 2701 et
seq., title 47 U.S.C. section 222, or other applicable law;

(iii) Unless the user provided direction using
an online tool, the user consented to disclosure of the content of electronic
communications; or

(iv) Disclosure of the content of electronic
communications of the user is reasonably necessary for administration of the
estate. [L 2016, c 162, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next